Alaska, session 34, HB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 43 is amended by adding a new chapter to read: 05 Chapter 62. Federal Campaign Spending Tax. 06 Sec. 43.62.010. Levy of federal campaign tax. A tax of five percent is levied 07 on the amount expended in the state for a federal political campaign. In this section, 08 (1) "amount expended" includes an amount expended for media, 09 salaries, consultants, and federally reportable expenses; 10 (2) "federally reportable expense" means a disbursement or 11 expenditure required to be reported to the Federal Election Commission under 52 12 U.S.C. 30104. 13 Sec. 43.62.020. Payment of federal campaign tax. The tax levied by 14 AS 43.62.010 is due at the time the expenditure is made. A federal political campaign 01 shall collect the tax and remit the tax to the department in accordance with regulations 02 adopted by the department. 03 Sec. 43.62.030. Relationship to municipal taxes. The tax levied by 04 AS 43.62.010 is in addition to any tax imposed by a municipality. 05 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.